Wyoming, session 2026, HB0188.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-29-120 is created to read:

22-29-120. County board and district directors; when
director election is required.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
(i) "County board" means any board for which the
board of county commissioners appoint the directors of the
board, including any board or district authorized under
title 18 of the Wyoming statutes;

(ii) "Director" includes directors, trustees,
supervisors or members of a county board or special
district.

(b) Beginning with the 2028 general election and each
general election thereafter and subject to subsection (e)
of this section, the directors of a county board or special
district shall be elected at each general election if:

(i) The directors are not otherwise subject to
election under this chapter or the applicable principal
act;

(ii) Under the terms of the applicable principal
act, the directors are appointed or required to be
appointed by the board of county commissioners or another
entity specified in the principal act; and

HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
(iii) The average annual budget or the average
expenditures of the county board or special district for
the immediately preceding five (5) fiscal years, as
determined on January 1 of the year of the general
election, is not less than twenty million dollars
($20,000,000.00).

(c) Any election required under this section shall be
conducted in accordance with this act, unless the specific
provisions of the applicable principal act are effective
and controlling to the extent that they conflict with this
section and act.

(d) Any election required under this section shall be
for all directors of the special district or county board,
unless the terms of the members are otherwise specified in
the applicable principal act.

(e) The election specified in this section shall not
be required if any of the following occur:

(i) The average annual budget or average total
expenditures of the county board or special district for
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
the immediately preceding five (5) fiscal years, as
determined on January 1 of the year of the general
election, is or becomes less than twenty million dollars
($20,000,000.00); or

(ii) Another law is enacted to expressly provide
for the election of the directors of the county board or
special district.

(f) Upon an election no longer being required under
this section and the expiration of the term of directors
elected under this section, the directors of the county
board or special district shall be appointed in accordance
with the terms of the applicable principal act.

Section 2. W.S. 10-5-202(a), 11-16-113(a)(intro),
11-16-118(a), 18-7-103(b), 18-8-104(a) and (b), 18-9-102(a)
and (d), 18-9-201(a)(intro) and (c), 18-10-103(a),
18-11-102(a), 18-13-101(b), 18-14-101(b), 22-29-103 by
creating a new subsection (g) and 35-2-1202 by creating a
new subsection (b) are amended to read:

HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
10-5-202. Airport board; organization; corporate
powers; personal liability; compensation; appointment of
manager.

(a) The authority and powers granted in W.S. 10-5-101
through 10-5-204 and the control of funds named may be
under the control of an airport board. Upon majority vote
of board members the board may issue revenue bonds, notes,
warrants and other revenue securities in the same manner
provided by W.S. 35-2-424 through 35-2-435 for trustees of
hospital districts for the purposes of W.S. 10-5-101
through 10-5-204. The board shall be appointed by the
municipal or county governing body and consist of five (5)
members, all of whom shall be qualified electors of the
county in which they serve. The selection of board members
shall be subject to the election requirements of W.S.
22-29-120. One (1) member of the board to be appointed for
one (1) year; one (1) for two (2) years; one (1) for three
(3) years; one (1) for four (4) years; and one (1) for five
(5) years, and in each case until the first Monday in
February following the expiration of the year. The
municipal or county governing body in their January meeting
of each year shall appoint a successor to the board member
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
whose term shall expire during the year. Thereafter
appointments for a full term shall be for five (5) years.
Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled by
appointment by the municipal or county governing body.

11-16-113. Establishment of district.

(a) If the commission determines the operation of the
proposed district is administratively practicable, it shall
appoint two (2) supervisors who are owners of land in the
district and who shall be subject to the election
requirements of W.S. 22-29-120, to act with three (3)
supervisors elected as provided hereinafter as the
governing body of the district. The district shall be a
governmental subdivision of this state and a public body
corporate and politic. The two (2) appointed landowner
supervisors shall present to the secretary of state an
application signed by them setting forth by recital only
and not in detail:

11-16-118. District supervisors; term; vacancies;
expenses; removal; quorum; bond required of employees;
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
areas included in district; cooperative agreement with
city.

(a) The term of the two (2) landowner supervisors
appointed or elected extends from their appointment or
election until the second annual election held in the
district. A supervisor shall hold office from his election
or appointment and taking of the oath of office until his
successor has been elected or appointed, and qualified.
Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies
in the office of any supervisor shall be filled by
appointment by the commission upon the recommendations of
the district supervisors, the appointee to serve until the
next election at which time the vacancy shall be filled by
the electors for the unexpired term. A supervisor shall
receive no compensation for his services, but is entitled
to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily
incurred in the discharge of his duties. Any supervisor may
be removed by the commission upon notice and hearing, for
neglect of duty or malfeasance in office.

HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
18-7-103. Library fund under control of board of
directors; appointment, powers, duties, terms of directors;
manner of filling vacancies on board.

(b) Except as otherwise specified in this subsection,
the county library board of directors shall be appointed by
the county commissioners and shall be composed of not less
than three (3) and not more than five (5) competent and
responsible residents who are representative of the entire
county and who shall serve without compensation. Before
entering upon his duties the treasurer of the county
library board shall execute and deposit with the county
commissioners a good and sufficient bond for the faithful
performance of his duties in an amount required by the
county commissioners. The bond shall be payable to the
people of the state of Wyoming and be approved by the
county commissioners. One (1) director shall be appointed
for one (1) year, one (1) director (or two (2) if the board
consists of four (4) or five (5) members) shall be
appointed for two (2) years, and one (1) director (or two
(2), if the board consists of five (5) directors) shall be
appointed for three (3) years, each term to commence on
July 1 following the appointment. Thereafter the county
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
commissioners shall before July 1 of each year appoint a
director or directors to replace the retiring director or
directors for a term of three (3) years and until a
successor is appointed. A director may be appointed for two
(2) consecutive terms and shall not be eligible for
reappointment until two (2) years after the expiration of
his second term. The appointment of directors under this
subsection shall be subject to the election requirements of
W.S. 22-29-120.

18-8-104. Hospital generally under control of board
of trustees; appointment, powers and duties of trustees;
incorporation; use of funds for erection of hospital; term
of lease; consolidation of hospitals; acquisition of land;
removal of board member; filling of vacancies.

(a) The erection, management and control of the
county memorial hospital, county memorial hospital fund and
all property and funds received for the benefit of the
hospital shall be by a board of trustees composed of at
least five (5) but not more than eleven (11) competent and
responsible citizens of the county appointed by the board
of county commissioners. The appointment of trustees shall
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
be subject to the election requirements of W.S. 22-29-120.
The number of members of any board of trustees shall be an
odd number determined by the county commissioners. The
first board of trustees, or additional members to a board
of trustees, as soon as appointed shall draw lots for the
purpose of determining the term of each member of the
board. Up to two (2) members of the original board or
additional members of the board shall serve for a term of
one (1) year, up to two (2) for a term of two (2) years, up
to two (2) for a term of three (3) years, up to two (2) for
a term of four (4) years and up to two (2) for a term of
five (5) years after their appointment. Terms thereafter
shall be five (5) years, consecutively staggered. Each
trustee shall serve until the first Monday of July
following the expiration of their term and the board of
county commissioners annually at their meeting in June
shall appoint a successor to the trustee or trustees whose
term expires. As soon as the original board has determined
the terms of its members they shall organize by electing a
president, secretary and treasurer of the board. As soon as
they are organized they shall file with the county clerk
and the secretary of state a certificate showing their
organization, for which filing no fee or charge shall be
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
paid. Upon filing the certificate the board of trustees is
a body corporate with power to sue and be sued under the
name of "Board of Trustees of the Memorial Hospital of ....
County". No individual member of the board of trustees is
personally liable for any action or procedure of the board.
The corporation has perpetual existence and it is not
necessary to file any other or further certificate than
that filed upon the original organization of the board of
trustees.

(b) Annually upon the appointment or election of a
new member of the board, the trustees shall meet and
organize by electing a president, secretary and treasurer.
Each member of the board shall serve without compensation
and the treasurer of the board shall give bond in such
amount and with such sureties as approved by the board of
county commissioners conditioned for the faithful
performance of his duties and the full accounting for all
monies received as treasurer. The board may allow and pay
to the secretary such reasonable compensation as they deem
proper for secretarial, accounting and other services
required of him in addition to his general duties as a
member of the board.
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397

18-9-102. Board of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees provided by W.S.
18-9-101(a)(iii) shall be composed of not less than five
(5) nor more than nine (9) competent citizens of the county
appointed by the board of county commissioners, subject to
the election requirements of W.S. 22-29-120. Trustees shall
serve five (5) year terms which shall be staggered. The
board of county commissioners shall annually appoint a
successor to the trustee whose term expires, subject to the
election requirements of W.S. 22-29-120. The term of each
succeeding trustee shall commence on the first Monday in
January next following the date of his appointment or
election. A trustee may be appointed or elected for
successive terms.

(d) Each year when a new member of the board is
appointed or elected, the trustees shall meet and again
organize by electing a chairman, secretary and treasurer.
Each member of the board shall serve without compensation
and the board treasurer shall give bond in such amount and
such securities as approved by the county commissioners
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties and
the accounting for all board monies. The board may pay the
secretary such compensation as proper for secretarial,
accounting and other services required of him apart from
his duties as a member of the board.

18-9-201. Recreational facilities and systems of
public recreation; authority to establish and maintain;
joint action by political subdivision; tax levies; removal.

(a) The governing body of any city, town, county or
school district either independently or jointly through any
combination thereof, may establish a system of public
recreation as provided by W.S. 18-9-101(a)(i) through (iii)
and, if it does so, shall appoint a board of trustees to
control, maintain and supervise the properties. The
appointment of trustees under this section shall be subject
to the election requirements of W.S. 22-29-120. In
administering properties under this section, the board may:

(c) The governing body which appointed the member of
the board of trustees may remove that member of the board
of trustees for cause without a public hearing unless the
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
trustee requests that the action be taken during a public
hearing. Members of the board of trustees who were elected
may be removed or suspended in accordance with W.S.
18-3-902 and 18-3-903. Vacancies on the board of trustees
shall be filled by the governing body for the balance of
the unexpired term created by the vacancy.

18-10-103. Board of trustees; appointment;
composition; qualifications of members; terms of office;
vacancies; removal.

(a) Each board of county commissioners of any county
owning, constructing or acquiring any museum or collection
of exhibits shall appoint a board of trustees for the
museum or collection composed of five (5) electors of the
county, subject to the election requirements of W.S.
22-29-120. The initial board of trustees shall be appointed
as follows: one (1) member for a one (1) year term, two (2)
for a two (2) year term and two (2) for a three (3) year
term, with each term commencing on July 1 of the year of
appointment. Thereafter the terms shall be three (3) years.
Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms.

HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
18-11-102. Powers; management; rates; penalty for
violation of rules; removal.

(a) Following the creation of a solid waste disposal
district the board of county commissioners shall appoint
not less than three (3) nor more than nine (9) residents of
the district to constitute the governing board of the
district, subject to the election requirements of W.S.
22-29-120. Appointees shall serve a term of three (3) years
and may be reappointed. Members of the governing board who
are elected under W.S. 22-29-120 shall serve a term of four
(4) years and may be reelected, subject to W.S. 22-29-120.
Terms of office shall be staggered. The governing board may
exercise all powers granted to cities and towns by W.S.
15-1-103(a)(xxi) and (xl) and shall adopt rules and
regulations in managing the disposal of solid wastes within
the district. Violation of a rule or regulation of the
governing board requiring disposal of solid wastes in
designated sites constitutes a misdemeanor punishable upon
conviction by a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00) or imprisonment not exceeding six (6)
months or both. A governing board may also enforce its
rules and regulations by appropriate legal proceedings and
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
expend and generate revenue relative to the purpose of a
solid waste disposal district. The governing board may
permit persons or entities not included within the district
to utilize the facilities of the district. The governing
board may impose fees upon persons or entities included
within or outside of the district for the privilege of
utilizing the facilities of the district at rates
established by the governing board and any revenue
generated in this manner shall only be used to operate the
district.

18-13-101. Day care centers; funding or operation
authorized.

(b) A board of county commissioners may establish a
fund to promote, establish and maintain day care centers.
The money may only be expended upon resolution for the
establishment, promotion, maintenance and development of
day care centers and may be paid to corporations or
associations engaged in operating day care centers. A board
of county commissioners may also be the governing authority
of a day care center and appoint and supervise a board of
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
directors to operate a day care center, subject to the
election requirements of W.S. 22-29-120.

18-14-101. Establishment; appointment; terms;
officers; meetings; compensation; establishment under joint
powers agreement.

(b) A regional transportation authority established
by resolution of any board of county commissioners shall be
comprised of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9)
residents of the county appointed by the board. The
appointment of members under this subsection shall be
subject to the election requirements of W.S. 22-29-120.
Appointees shall serve a term of three (3) years and may be
appointed for one (1) additional term. Members of the board
who are elected shall serve a term of four (4) years and
may be reelected for one (1) additional term, subject to
W.S. 22-29-120. Terms of office shall be staggered. The
board of county commissioners shall appoint a county
resident to fill the unexpired term of any vacancy
occurring on the authority. The authority shall elect from
its membership a chairman, secretary and a treasurer and
shall meet at least once every three (3) months at the call
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
of the chairman or upon the request of a majority of the
membership. Members shall serve without compensation but
shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and per diem
expenses in the manner and amount provided state employees.

22-29-103. Applicability to special districts;
general provisions.

(g) The election requirements of W.S. 22-29-120 shall
apply to the districts subject to this act unless the
applicable principal act expressly provides otherwise or
expressly provides for the election of members of the board
or district.

35-2-1202. Body corporate; name and style; powers
generally; rules and regulations of trustees.

(b) The selection of trustees for each district shall
be subject to the election requirements of W.S. 22-29-120.

Section 3. This act shall apply to all boards and
special districts specified in this act for which terms of
directors, supervisors or trustees end on and after July 1,
HB0188

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0397
2026. Nothing in this act shall be construed to abrogate an
appointment made to a county board or special district
before July 1, 2026 or to require the election of a
director, supervisor or trustee who was appointed before
July 1, 2026 before the end of that director's,
supervisor's or trustee's term.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0188